Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1250.05
Taxation of air carriers; disposition of funds collected.

The money realized from any levy under sections 77-1250.03 and 77-1250.04 shall be first applied by the Tax Commissioner toward payment of any costs incurred by virtue of such levy and next to the payment of such taxes, interest, and penalties, and any balance remaining shall then be paid over to the person entitled thereto.

Laws 1959, c. 360, § 4, p. 1277;

R.S.1943, (1986), § 77-631.04;

Laws 1989, Spec. Sess., LB 7, § 7;

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 108;

Laws 2007, LB334, § 61.